Utah statutes.
62A-5-318.   Involuntary treatment with medication -- Committee -- Findings.

(1)  If, after commitment, a resident elects to refuse treatment with medication, the director, the administrator of the facility for persons with mental retardation, or a designee, shall submit documentation regarding the resident's proposed treatment to a committee composed of:

(a)  a licensed physician experienced in treating persons with mental retardation and related disabilities, who is not directly involved in the resident's treatment or diagnosis, and who is not biased toward any one facility;

(b)  a psychologist who is a designated mental retardation professional who is not directly involved in the resident's treatment or diagnosis; and

(c)  another designated mental retardation professional of the facility for persons with mental retardation, or a designee.

(2)  Based upon the court's finding, under Subsection 62A-5-312(13), that the resident lacks the ability to engage in a rational decision-making process regarding the need for habilitation, rehabilitation, care, or treatment, as demonstrated by evidence of inability to weigh the possible costs and benefits of treatment, the committee may authorize involuntary treatment with medication if it determines that:

(a)  the proposed treatment is in the medical best interest of the resident, taking into account the possible side effects as well as the potential benefits of the medication; and

(b)  the proposed treatment is in accordance with prevailing standards of accepted medical practice.

(3)  In making the determination described in Subsection (2), the committee shall consider the resident's general history and present condition, the specific need for medication and its possible side effects, and any previous reaction to the same or comparable medication.

(4)  Any authorization of involuntary treatment under this section shall be periodically reviewed in accordance with rules promulgated by the division.

